Utah statutes.
76-6-406.   Theft by extortion.
(1) A person is guilty of theft if he obtains or exercises control over the
property of another by extortion and with a purpose to deprive him thereof.
(2)  As used in this section, extortion occurs when a person threatens to:
(a)  Cause physical harm in the future to the person threatened or to any
other person or to property at any time; or
(b)  Subject the person threatened or any other person to physical confinement
or restraint; or
(c)  Engage in other conduct constituting a crime; or
(d)  Accuse any person of a crime or expose him to hatred, contempt, or
ridicule; or
(e)  Reveal any information sought to be concealed by the person threatened;
or
(f)  Testify or provide information or withhold testimony or information with
respect to another's legal claim or defense; or
(g)  Take action as an official against anyone or anything, or withhold
official action, or cause such action or withholding; or
(h)  Bring about or continue a strike, boycott, or other similar collective
action to obtain property which is not demanded or received for the benefit of
the group which the actor purports to represent; or
(i)  Do any other act which would not in itself substantially benefit him but
which would harm substantially any other person with respect to that person's
health, safety, business, calling, career, financial condition, reputation, or
personal relationships.
